Utah statutes.
73-3b-302.   Fee.

(1)  The state engineer shall assess an annual fee, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, on each person who holds a groundwater recharge or recovery permit.

(2)  The fee shall reflect the division's costs to administer and monitor groundwater recharge and recovery projects.

